Hawaii statutes.
[§707-782]
Labor trafficking in the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense
of labor trafficking in the second degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Acts as an individual or uses a licensed
business or business enterprise to aid another in a venture knowing that the
other person in that venture is committing the offense of labor trafficking in
the first degree; or

(b) Benefits, financially or by receiving something
of value, from participation in a venture knowing or in reckless disregard of
the fact that another person has engaged in any act described in paragraph (a)
in the course of that venture or that another person in that venture is
committing the offense of labor trafficking in the first degree.

(2) Labor trafficking in the second degree is
a class B felony; provided that if a violation of subsection (1) involves
kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, sexual assault in the first, second, or
third degree, or the attempt to commit sexual assault in the first, second, or
third degree, or an attempt to cause the death of a person, or if a death
results, the offense shall be a class A felony.

(3) Upon conviction of a defendant for an
offense under subsection (1), the court shall also order that any and all
business licenses issued by the State be revoked for the business or enterprise
that the defendant used to aid in the offense of labor trafficking in the
second degree; provided that the court, in its discretion, may reinstate a
business license upon petition to the court by any remaining owner or partner
of the business or enterprise who was not convicted of an offense under this
section or section 707-781. [L 2011, c 146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next